North Carolina, session 2025, HB63.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The following described property is removed from the corporate limits
of the Town of Andrews:
TRACT I:
Parcel No. 556617114476000, being approximately 41 acres and more particularly described
in that certain deed from Douglas Cole and Mildred Alice Cole, husband and wife, to Douglas
Cole, Trustee of the Douglas Cole Family Trust, dated November 13, 1992, and recorded in Deed
Book 666, Page 75, of the Cherokee County Registry.
TRACT II:
Parcel No. 556617213361000, being approximately 10.75 acres and more particularly
described in that certain deed from Andrew S. Pyle and wife, Kelly K. Pyle, to Steelhouse
Mountain, LLC, a North Carolina limited liability company, dated September 9, 2018, and
recorded in Deed Book 1596, Page 266, of the Cherokee County Registry.
TRACT III:
Parcel No. 556618219676000, being approximately 2.99 acres and more particularly
described in that certain deed from Andrew S. Pyle and wife, Kelly K. Pyle, to Steelhouse
Mountain, LLC, a North Carolina limited liability company, dated September 9, 2018, and
recorded in Deed Book 1596, Page 260, of the Cherokee County Registry.
TRACT IV:
Parcel No. 556617202977000, being approximately 7.26 acres and more particularly
described in that certain deed from Andrew S. Pyle and wife, Kelly K. Pyle, to Steelhouse
Mountain, LLC, a North Carolina limited liability company, dated September 9, 2018, and
recorded in Deed Book 1596, Page 262, of the Cherokee County Registry.
SECTION 2. This act has no effect upon the validity of any liens of the Town of
Andrews for ad valorem taxes or special assessments outstanding before the effective date of this
act. Such liens may be collected or foreclosed upon after the effective date of this act as though
the property were still within the corporate limits of the Town of Andrews.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective June 30, 2025. Property in the territory
described in Section 1 of this act as of January 1, 2025, is no longer subject to municipal taxes
for taxes imposed for taxable years beginning on or after July 1, 2025.
*H63-v-1*